Maryland, session 2026, HB1559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–525.
(a) (1) In this section[, “disability”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) (I) “DISABILITY” means:
[(i)] 1. a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits
one or more of an individual’s major life activities;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
[(ii)] 2. a record of having a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities; or
[(iii)] 3. being regarded as having a physical or mental impairment
that substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities.
[(2)] (II) “Disability” shall be construed in accordance with the ADA
Amendments Act of 2008, P.L. 110–325.
(3) (I) “SEMI–INDEPENDENT LIVING ARRANGEMENT” MEANS A
SUBSIDIZED LIVING ARRANGEMENT FOR YOUTH RECEIVING YOUTH TRANSITIONAL
SERVICES IN AN APARTMENT, A BOARDER ARRANGEMENT, A COLLEGE DORM, OR
OTHER LIVING ARRANGEMENT APPROVED BY A LOCAL DEPARTMENT.
(II) “SEMI–INDEPENDENT LIVING ARRANGEMENT” DOES NOT
INCLUDE AN ARRANGEMENT FOR HOUSING IN A TRANSIENT OR AN
EMERGENCY–TYPE FACILITY, INCLUDING A RESCUE MISSION, A NONRESIDENTIAL
HOTEL OR MOTEL, AN ADULT SHELTER, OR A TOURIST HOME.
(3) (4) (I) “UNLICENSED SETTING” MEANS A SETTING FOR AN
OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT THAT IS NOT LICENSED BY A STATE LICENSING ENTITY
FOR CUSTODY, PLACEMENT, WELFARE, AND HOUSING OF CHILDREN.
(II) “UNLICENSED SETTING” INCLUDES:
1. A HOTEL, MOTEL, OR SHORT–TERM RENTAL;
2. A SHELTER DESIGNATED TO MEET THE NEEDS OF A
CHILD WHO HAS RUN AWAY OR WHO IS HOMELESS; AND
3. AN OFFICE BUILDING OR OTHER NONRESIDENTIAL
ENVIRONMENT.
(III) “UNLICENSED SETTING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. THE VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT OF A FORMER CINA;
2. A SEMI–INDEPENDENT LIVING ARRANGEMENT; OR
2. 3. THE PLACEMENT OF A CHILD WITH:
A. AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A KINSHIP CAREGIVER OR
FOSTER PARENT OR WHO IS IN THE PROCESS OF APPLYING TO BE A KINSHIP
CAREGIVER OR FOSTER PARENT; OR
– 3 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. A PARENT, INCLUDING IN A FAMILY–BASED
RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT SETTING.
(b) (1) The Administration shall establish a program of out–of–home
placement for minor children:
(i) who are placed in the custody of a local department, for a period
of not more than 180 days, by a parent or legal guardian under a voluntary placement
agreement;
(ii) who are abused, abandoned, neglected, or dependent, if a
juvenile court:
1. has determined that continued residence in the child’s
home is contrary to the child’s welfare; and
2. has committed the child to the custody or guardianship of
a local department; or
(iii) who, with the approval of the Administration, are placed in an
out–of–home placement by a local department under a voluntary placement agreement
subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(c) (1) [In] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IN establishing the out–of–home placement program the Administration
shall:
[(1)] (I) provide time–limited family reunification services to a child
placed in an out–of–home placement and to the parents or guardian of the child, in order
to facilitate the child’s safe and appropriate reunification within a timely manner;
[(2)] (II) concurrently develop and implement a permanency plan that is
in the best interests of the child; and
[(3)] (III) provide training on an annual basis for the staff at each local
department who administer requests for voluntary placement agreements for children with
developmental disabilities or mental illnesses under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) THE OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROHIBIT THE PLACEMENT OF A CHILD IN USE OF AN
UNLICENSED SETTING FOR A CHILD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
Article – Family Law
5–525.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Disability” means:
1. a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits
one or more of an individual’s major life activities;
2. a record of having a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities; or
3. being regarded as having a physical or mental impairment
that substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities.
(ii) “Disability” shall be construed in accordance with the ADA
Amendments Act of 2008, P.L. 110–325.
(3) (i) “Semi–independent living arrangement” means a subsidized
living arrangement for youth receiving youth transitional services in an apartment, a
boarder arrangement, a college dorm, or other living arrangement approved by a local
department.
(ii) “Semi–independent living arrangement” does not include an
arrangement for housing in a transient or an emergency–type facility, including a rescue
mission, a nonresidential hotel or motel, an adult shelter, or a tourist home.
(4) (i) “Unlicensed setting” means a setting for an
out–of–home placement that is not licensed by a State licensing entity for custody,
placement, welfare, and housing of children.
(ii) “Unlicensed setting” includes:
1. a hotel, motel, or short–term rental;
2. a shelter designated to meet the needs of a child who has
run away or who is homeless; [and]
3. an office building or other nonresidential environment;
AND
4. AN INPATIENT UNIT OR EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT OF
A HOSPITAL IN WHICH THE CHILD IS A PATIENT UNDER THE AGE OF 22 YEARS WHO
– 5 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
REMAINS FOR MORE THAN 48 HOURS AFTER BEING MEDICALLY CLEARED FOR
DISCHARGE OR TRANSFER.
(iii) “Unlicensed setting” does not include:
1. the voluntary placement of a former CINA;
2. a semi–independent living arrangement;
or
3. the placement of a child with:
A. an individual who is a kinship caregiver or foster parent
or who is in the process of applying to be a kinship caregiver or foster parent; or
B. a parent, including in a family–based residential
treatment setting.
(b) (1) The Administration shall establish a program of out–of–home
placement for minor children:
(i) who are placed in the custody of a local department, for a period
of not more than 180 days, by a parent or legal guardian under a voluntary placement
agreement;
(ii) who are abused, abandoned, neglected, or dependent, if a
juvenile court:
1. has determined that continued residence in the child’s
home is contrary to the child’s welfare; and
2. has committed the child to the custody or guardianship of
a local department; or
(iii) who, with the approval of the Administration, are placed in an
out–of–home placement by a local department under a voluntary placement agreement
subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, in establishing
the out–of–home placement program the Administration shall:
(i) provide time–limited family reunification services to a child
placed in an out–of–home placement and to the parents or guardian of the child, in order
to facilitate the child’s safe and appropriate reunification within a timely manner;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
(ii) concurrently develop and implement a permanency plan that is
in the best interests of the child; and
(iii) provide training on an annual basis for the staff at each local
department who administer requests for voluntary placement agreements for children with
developmental disabilities or mental illnesses under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The out–of–home placement program established by the
Administration shall prohibit the use of an unlicensed setting for a child.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–388.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Coordinators” means the pediatric overstay coordinator in the Department
and the pediatric overstay coordinator in the Department of Human Services.
(c) “Pediatric hospital overstay patient” means a patient under the age of 22 years
who remains in an inpatient unit or emergency department of a hospital for more than 48
hours after being medically cleared for discharge or transfer.
19–390.
(a) The Department and the Department of Human Services shall establish a
pediatric hospital overstay coordinator within each department.
(b) The coordinators shall act in the best interest of a pediatric overstay patient
by [coordinating]:
(1) REPORTING ANY INSTANCE OF A PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY
PATIENT TO THE PLACEMENT MANAGER IN THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE FOR
CHILDREN AS SOON AS THE PATIENT IS KNOWN TO THE COORDINATOR; AND
(2) COORDINATING between hospitals, relevant State agencies and
programs, and providers of mental health and substance use disorder services.
(c) The coordinators shall:
(1) Advocate on behalf of pediatric hospital overstay patients while
maintaining appropriate patient confidentiality;
– 7 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Review policies and procedures of relevant State agencies and make
recommendations for necessary changes to the policies and procedures to better serve
pediatric hospital overstay patients;
(3) Maintain data on each pediatric hospital overstay patient, including:
(i) Patient’s length of stay;
(ii) The responsible State agency, if applicable;
(iii) Services needed;
(iv) Placement options being sought by the patient;
(v) Information regarding previous hospital admissions for a
behavioral health diagnosis; and
(VI) INFORMATION REGARDING WHETHER THE ADMISSION WAS
BASED ON AN EMERGENCY PETITION AND, IF SO, WHETHER THE EMERGENCY
PETITION WAS EXECUTED IN A SCHOOL; AND
(vi) (VII) Any other relevant data; and
(4) [Report] PROVIDE MONTHLY REPORTS on the data collected under
this subsection to the Secretary [and], the Secretary of Human Services, AND THE CHILD
AND YOUTH PLACEMENT REVIEW PANEL IN THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE FOR
CHILDREN.
(5) A HOSPITAL IMMEDIATELY SHALL NOTIFY THE COORDINATORS,
THROUGH A SYSTEM DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT, ABOUT A PEDIATRIC
HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT.
Article – Human Services
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “Hospital” has the meaning stated in § 19–301 of the Health – General Article.
(m) “Office” means the Governor’s Office for Children.
(q) “Special Secretary” means the Special Secretary of the Governor’s Office for
Children.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
SUBTITLE 14. CHILD AND YOUTH PLACEMENT REVIEW.
8–1401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “CHILD IN AN UNLICENSED SETTING” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
UNDER THE AGE OF 22 YEARS:
(I) IN AN OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT WHO IS RESIDING IN A
HOTEL, AN OFFICE BUILDING FOR MORE THAN 12 CONSECUTIVE HOURS, A SHELTER,
OR ANY OTHER UNLICENSED SETTING; OR
(II) WHO IS A PEDIATRIC OVERSTAY PATIENT.
(2) “CHILD IN AN UNLICENSED SETTING” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF 22 YEARS WHO IS RECEIVING A SELF–INDEPENDENT
LIVING STIPEND, LIVING WITH KIN AWAITING APPROVAL FOR PLACEMENT, OR ON
AFTERCARE WITH A PARENT.
(C) “PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 19–388 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(D) “PLACEMENT MANAGER” MEANS THE PLACEMENT MANAGER OF THE
CHILD AND YOUTH PLACEMENT REVIEW PANEL.
(E) (D) “PLACEMENT TEAM” MEANS THE RAPID RESPONSE PLACEMENT
TEAM.
(F) (E) “REVIEW PANEL” MEANS THE CHILD AND YOUTH PLACEMENT
REVIEW PANEL.
(F) “SENIOR ADVISOR” MEANS THE SENIOR ADVISOR FOR CHILDREN AND
FAMILIES IN THE OFFICE.
8–1402.
THERE IS A CHILD AND YOUTH PLACEMENT REVIEW PANEL IN THE OFFICE.
8–1403.
– 9 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) (1) THE HEAD OF THE REVIEW PANEL IS THE PLACEMENT MANAGER
THERE IS A SENIOR ADVISOR FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES IN THE OFFICE.
(2) THE SENIOR ADVISOR SHALL OVERSEE THE WORK OF THE
REVIEW PANEL.
(2) THE PLACEMENT MANAGER SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR.
(3) THE PLACEMENT MANAGER SENIOR ADVISOR SERVES AT THE
PLEASURE OF THE GOVERNOR.
(B) THE PLACEMENT MANAGER SENIOR ADVISOR SHALL DEVOTE
FULL–TIME TO THE DUTIES OF THE OFFICE.
(C) THE PLACEMENT MANAGER SENIOR ADVISOR IS ENTITLED TO:
(1) COMPENSATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET; AND
(2) REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE STANDARD STATE
TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(D) THE PLACEMENT MANAGER SENIOR ADVISOR SHALL:
(1) SERVE AS THE POINT OF CONTACT FOR THE PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL
OVERSTAY COORDINATORS;
(2) OVERSEE THE WORK OF THE REVIEW PANEL TO ENSURE THE
PROVISION OF ADEQUATE MEDICAL AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE FOR CHILDREN
IN UNLICENSED SETTINGS IN THE STATE; AND
(3) KEEP THE OFFICIAL RECORDS OF THE REVIEW PANEL; AND
(4) DOCUMENT INFORMATION FOR CASES USING STANDARD FORMS
AND DATA.
8–1404.
(A) THE REVIEW PANEL CONSISTS OF:
(1) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
(2) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(3) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE PLACEMENT MANAGER SENIOR ADVISOR; AND
(5) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL SERVICES;
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF 211 MARYLAND;
(III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A CHILD ADVOCACY GROUP WITH
EXPERTISE IN FOSTER CARE;
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A LEGAL ADVOCACY GROUP WITH
EXPERTISE IN FOSTER CARE;
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND RESOURCE
PARENT ASSOCIATION WHO HAS LIVED EXPERIENCE WITH FOSTER CARE;
(VI) ONE CHILD WELFARE CASEWORKER;
(VII) ONE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROVIDER;
(VIII) TWO LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH CLINICIANS WITH
EXPERTISE IN TRAUMA, INCLUDING DEMONSTRATED EXPERIENCE AND TRAINING IN
CHILD AND ADOLESCENT CARE AND FAMILY CARE; AND
(IX) ONE INDIVIDUAL WITH LIVED EXPERIENCE IN THE STATE
FOSTER CARE SYSTEM THE SECRETARY OF JUVENILE SERVICES, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE; AND
(6) THE COORDINATORS, AS DEFINED IN § 19–388 OF THE HEALTH –
GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERS APPOINTED TO THE
REVIEW PANEL SHALL REFLECT THE GEOGRAPHIC, RACIAL, ETHNIC, CULTURAL,
AND GENDER DIVERSITY OF THE STATE IN CONDUCTING THE ANALYSIS REQUIRED
– 11 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
UNDER § 8–1406 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE REVIEW PANEL MAY CONSULT WITH
INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE KNOWLEDGE OF THE CHILD.
(C) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS PRESENT AT A MEETING SHALL
CONSTITUTE A QUORUM.
(D) THE REVIEW PANEL SHALL MEET MONTHLY AT LEAST EVERY 2 MONTHS
AT THE TIMES AND PLACES THE REVIEW PANEL DETERMINES.
8–1405.
(A) THE PLACEMENT MANAGER SENIOR ADVISOR SHALL SERVE AS THE
CHAIR OF THE REVIEW PANEL.
(B) A MEMBER OF THE REVIEW PANEL:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE REVIEW
PANEL; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(C) THE OFFICE SHALL PROVIDE STAFF SUPPORT FOR THE REVIEW PANEL.
8–1406.
(A) THE REVIEW PANEL SHALL:
(1) ANALYZE ANY INSTANCE INVOLVING A CHILD IN A PEDIATRIC
OVERSTAY OR AN UNLICENSED SETTING; AND
(2) SUPPORT PLACEMENT EFFORTS INVOLVING A CHILD IDENTIFIED
UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SECTION BY REFERRING THE CHILD TO:
(I) LOCAL DEPARTMENTS OF SOCIAL SERVICES;
(II) PUBLIC OR PRIVATE RESIDENTIAL CARE PROGRAMS;
(III) A RESIDENTIAL PROGRAM OPERATED BY OR UNDER
CONTRACT WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES;
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
(IV) A FOSTER CARE HOME APPROVED BY A LOCAL DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL SERVICES;
(V) A TREATMENT FOSTER CARE HOME;
(VI) THE PLACEMENT TEAM; OR
(VII) ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE ENTITY TO SUPPORT THE
PLACEMENT OF THE CHILD PROPOSE SYSTEMIC IMPROVEMENTS BASED ON THE
ANALYSIS CONDUCTED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE
REVIEW PANEL SHALL REPORT ON THE ANALYSIS CONDUCTED UNDER THIS
SECTION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
8–1407.
(A) WHEN A PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT REMAINS IN THE
HOSPITAL FOR MORE THAN 72 HOURS, THE PLACEMENT MANAGER SHALL CONVENE
A RAPID RESPONSE PLACEMENT TEAM
(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
WITHIN 48 HOURS OF BEING NOTIFIED OF A PEDIATRIC OVERSTAY PATIENT, THE
COORDINATORS SHALL CONVENE A RAPID RESPONSE PLACEMENT TEAM.
(2) IF THE COORDINATORS ARE NOTIFIED OF A PEDIATRIC OVERSTAY
PATIENT ON A FRIDAY, THE COORDINATORS SHALL CONVENE A PLACEMENT TEAM
WITHIN 72 HOURS OF BEING NOTIFIED OR EARLIER IF POSSIBLE.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION PREVENTS THE COORDINATORS
FROM TAKING STEPS TO SECURE A PLACEMENT FOR A PEDIATRIC OVERSTAY
PATIENT BEFORE HOLDING THE INITIAL MEETING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(E) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) THE PLACEMENT TEAM SHALL CONSIST OF:
(1) THE SENIOR ADVISOR, IN AN ADVISORY CAPACITY;
(2) THE COORDINATORS, AS DEFINED IN § 19–388 OF THE HEALTH –
GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
– 13 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (3) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS IF APPLICABLE, THE
FOLLOWING MEMBERS WHO HAVE KNOWLEDGE OF THE CHILD, DESIGNATED BY THE
PLACEMENT MANAGER COORDINATORS:
(I) A REPRESENTATIVE OF 211 MARYLAND;
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL SERVICES;
(III) IF APPLICABLE, A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN UNLICENSED
SETTING WHERE A CHILD IS RESIDING; AND
(IV) (II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE HOSPITAL WHERE THE
CHILD IS CONSIDERED A PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT.
(C) THE PLACEMENT TEAM SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A PLAN FOR THE APPROPRIATE PLACEMENT OF A
PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT WHO HAS REMAINED IN A HOSPITAL FOR
MORE THAN 72 HOURS; AND
(2) ARRANGE FOR A TEMPORARY PLACEMENT IN A LICENSED
SETTING WHEN A PLACEMENT HAS BEEN IDENTIFIED, BUT A BED IS NOT
IMMEDIATELY AVAILABLE.
(D) THE PLACEMENT TEAM MAY:
(1) CONDUCT IMMEDIATE CLINICAL AND PLACEMENT ASSESSMENTS;
(2) OVERRIDE LOCAL DEPARTMENT PLACEMENT DECISIONS, IF
NECESSARY TO PLACE THE CHILD IN A CLINICALLY APPROPRIATE, LEAST
RESTRICTIVE ENVIRONMENT; AND
(3) SECURE IMMEDIATE PLACEMENT IN APPROPRIATE AND LEAST
RESTRICTIVE AVAILABLE LICENSED SETTINGS; AND
(4) (I) AUTHORIZE THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES TO
EXECUTE AN EMERGENCY PROCUREMENT UNDER § 13–108 OF THE STATE FINANCE
AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE WITH AN IN–STATE OR OUT–OF–STATE PROVIDER BY
PROVIDING THE JUSTIFICATION FOR THE USE OF EMERGENCY PROCUREMENT
METHOD;
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
(II) REQUIRE OUT–OF–STATE PLACEMENTS ONLY WHEN NO
IN–STATE PROVIDER OFFERS THE REQUIRED CARE NEEDED BY THE CHILD; AND
(III) REQUIRE ANY OUT–OF–STATE PROVIDER TO MAINTAIN
COMMUNICATION WITH THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN REGARDING TREATMENT AND
CARE OF THE CHILD.
(E) (1) WHEN A PLACEMENT TEAM IS CONVENED, THE THE PLACEMENT
TEAM SHALL MEET EACH DAY HOLD AN INITIAL IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL MEETING
IMMEDIATELY WITH ALL MEMBERS OF THE PLACEMENT TEAM AND HAVE DAILY
COMMUNICATION WITH ALL MEMBERS OF THE PLACEMENT TEAM UNTIL A
PLACEMENT FOR THE CHILD IS LOCATED SECURED.
(2) ONCE CONVENED, THE PLACEMENT TEAM SHALL HOLD AT LEAST
ONE IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL MEETING PER WEEK.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE
COMPLIANT WITH THE PROHIBITION ON THE USE OF AN INPATIENT UNIT OR
EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT FOR A PEDIATRIC OVERSTAY PATIENT ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 5–525(C)(2) OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE, IF THE DEPARTMENT IS
ACTIVELY SEARCHING FOR A PLACEMENT FOR THE CHILD.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Human Services
8–1408.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ADVISORY COUNCIL” MEANS THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL ON MARYLAND’S SYSTEM OF CARE FOR CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND
FAMILIES.
(B) THERE IS AN ADVISORY COUNCIL ON MARYLAND’S SYSTEM OF CARE
FOR CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES.
(C) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL CONSIST OF THE FOLLOWING
INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE EXPERIENCE AND KNOWLEDGE OF WORKING WITH
CHILDREN WITH BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CHALLENGES, ADVERSE CHILDHOOD
EXPERIENCES, AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES MEMBERS:
(1) THE SPECIAL SECRETARY, OR THE SPECIAL SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
– 15 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE PLACEMENT MANAGER SECRETARY OF HEALTH, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(3) THE SECRETARY OF JUVENILE SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(5) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(6) THE MARYLAND INSURANCE COMMISSIONER, OR THE
COMMISSIONER’S DESIGNEE;
(7) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(8) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE
COMMISSION, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(9) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE CHESAPEAKE REGIONAL
INFORMATION SYSTEM FOR OUR PATIENTS, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE;
(10) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE STATE–AUTHORIZED
ADMINISTRATOR OF 2–1–1 SERVICES IN MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR;
(3) (11) THE COORDINATORS, AS DEFINED IN § 19–388 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(4) (12) THE PUBLIC DEFENDER, OR THE PUBLIC DEFENDER’S
DESIGNEE;
(5) (13) THE STATE FOSTER YOUTH OMBUDSMAN; AND
(6) (14) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, WHO HAVE EXPERIENCE AND
KNOWLEDGE OF WORKING WITH CHILDREN WITH BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
CHALLENGES, ADVERSE CHILDHOOD EXPERIENCES, AND DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) THE SENIOR ADVISOR;
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL SERVICES;
(II) (III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND
ASSOCIATION OF RESOURCES FOR FAMILIES AND YOUTH;
(III) (IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF DISABILITY RIGHTS
MARYLAND;
(IV) (V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COMMUNITY
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ASSOCIATION OF MARYLAND;
(V) (VI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF MARYLAND LEGAL AID;
(VI) (VII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COURT APPOINTED
SPECIAL ADVOCATES OF MARYLAND;
(VII) (VIII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE NATIONAL
ASSOCIATION OF SOCIAL WORKERS – MARYLAND WHO IS A HOSPITAL–BASED
CLINICAL SOCIAL WORKER;
(VIII) (IX) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND CHAPTER
OF THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS;
(IX) (X) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND HOSPITAL
ASSOCIATION;
(X) (XI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A SPECIALTY PSYCHIATRIC
HOSPITAL;
(XI) (XII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ACUTE CARE HOSPITAL
EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT;
(XII) (XIII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND
RESOURCE PARENT ASSOCIATION;
(XIII) (XIV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND MENTAL
HEALTH ASSOCIATION;
(XIV) (XV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A RESIDENTIAL
TREATMENT PROVIDER IN THE STATE;
– 17 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(XV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A FAMILY OF A CHILD IN FOSTER
CARE; AND
(XVI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE WITH LIVED EXPERIENCE IN THE
STATE FOSTER CARE SYSTEM.
(D) (1) THE SPECIAL SECRETARY, OR THE SPECIAL SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE SENIOR ADVISOR, SHALL SERVE AS CHAIR OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(2) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL MEET QUARTERLY AT THE TIMES
AND PLACES THE ADVISORY COUNCIL DETERMINES.
(3) THE OFFICE SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
(4) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL HOLD JOINT MEETINGS WITH
THE INTERAGENCY COUNCIL ON CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES AT LEAST TWO
TIMES PER YEAR.
(E) A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(F) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) REVIEW EXISTING LAWS AND REGULATIONS TO ENSURE THAT
THEY FACILITATE THE PROVISION OF ADEQUATE MEDICAL AND BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH CARE IN THE STATE, INCLUDING TO YOUTH IN OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENTS
IN THE STATE;
(2) RECOMMEND TO THE INTERAGENCY COUNCIL ON CHILDREN,
YOUTH, AND FAMILIES ANY ADDITIONS OR CHANGES TO EXISTING LAWS OR
REGULATIONS DESIGNED TO FACILITATE THE PROVISION OF ADEQUATE MEDICAL
AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE TO CHILDREN IN NEED OF MEDICAL AND
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE IN THE STATE, INCLUDING YOUTH IN OUT–OF–HOME
PLACEMENTS IN THE STATE;
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
(3) IDENTIFY ANY GRANT OR MONEY FROM THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT, PRIVATE FOUNDATIONS, OR OTHER SOURCES THAT MAY BE
AVAILABLE FOR PROGRAMS RELATED TO CHILDREN IN OUT–OF–HOME
PLACEMENTS;
(4) ASSIST ORGANIZATIONS IN APPLYING FOR GRANTS IDENTIFIED
UNDER ITEM (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION RECOMMEND IMPROVEMENTS FOR
EDUCATION, OUTREACH, AND SUPPORT TO FOSTER CARE PARENTS IN THE STATE TO
PREVENT DISRUPTION IN PLACEMENTS;
(5) EXAMINE THE NEW JERSEY CHILDREN’S SYSTEM OF CARE
MODEL AND PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS ON HOW THE MODEL CAN BE
REPLICATED IN THE STATE IN CONSULTATION WITH AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION OR A PRIVATE RESEARCH ENTITY WITH EXPERTISE IN THE MODEL; AND
(6) REVIEW EXISTING LAWS AND REGULATIONS, PROVIDE
RECOMMENDATIONS IF GAPS ARE IDENTIFIED, AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO
ENSURE, IF A PARENT OR GUARDIAN IS NOT AVAILABLE TO MAKE MEDICAL
DECISIONS OR WHILE IN THE PROCESS OF OBTAINING A VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT
AGREEMENT, ALL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENTS HAVE ACCESS TO:
(I) LEGAL REPRESENTATION; AND
(II) EDUCATION SERVICES;
(7) REVIEW ANY RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE WORKGROUP ON
CHILDREN IN UNLICENSED SETTINGS AND PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAYS; AND
(8) REVIEW BARRIERS TO CAPACITY EXPANSION, INCLUDING RATE
REFORM AND INSURANCE PARITY, AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS.
(G) (1) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL FORM A SUBGROUP CONSISTING
OF THE MEMBERS LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1) THROUGH (12) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) THE SUBGROUP OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL MAY CONSULT WITH
EXPERTS AS NECESSARY, INCLUDING INSURERS, PAYORS, AND THE MARYLAND
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(3) THE SUBGROUP OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL:
(I) COMPLETE AN ASSESSMENT OF THE CURRENT NUMBER OF
LICENSED BEDS, STAFFED BEDS, AND PHYSICAL BEDS INTENDED TO SERVE THE
– 19 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
NEEDS OF CHILDREN AND YOUTH BY AGENCY, CATEGORIZED BY TYPE OF BED
INCLUSIVE OF AGE, GENDER, DIAGNOSIS, SEVERITY, AND SPECIALTY ACCEPTED FOR
THE FOLLOWING BED TYPES:
1. TRADITIONAL FOSTER HOMES;
2. PRIVATE AND PUBLIC TREATMENT FOSTER HOMES;
3. GROUP HOMES;
4. RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT CENTERS;
5. PRIVATE AND PUBLIC INPATIENT PSYCHIATRIC BEDS;
AND
6. RESPITE BEDS;
(II) DEVELOP AN ELECTRONIC PROCESS FOR TRACKING THE
REAL–TIME LOCATION, LENGTH OF STAY, AND DISCHARGE PLANS FOR PEDIATRIC
HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENTS, AS DEFINED IN § 19–388 OF THE HEALTH –
GENERAL ARTICLE, INCLUDING YOUTH UNDER OR IN THE PROCESS OF A
VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT;
(III) 1. DEVELOP A MODEL FOR STANDARDIZED DATA
COLLECTION WITH MANDATED UNIFORM METRICS, INCLUDING AGE, GENDER
IDENTITY, RACE, ETHNICITY, COUNTY OF ORIGIN, PAYOR TYPE, AND LENGTH OF
STAY FOR PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENTS, AS DEFINED IN § 19–388 OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE, INCLUDING YOUTH UNDER OR IN THE PROCESS
OF A VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT; AND
2. DESIGNATE AN ENTITY TO SERVE AS A CENTRAL
REPOSITORY FOR DATA COLLECTED; AND
(IV) DEVELOP A PLAN AND IDENTIFY RESOURCES NEEDED TO
EXPAND MOBILE RESPONSE AND STABILIZATION SERVICES ACROSS THE STATE TO
ENSURE STATEWIDE ACCESS AND FULL IMPLEMENTATION BY 2030.
(G) (H) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
GOVERNOR, THE PLACEMENT MANAGER, AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Human Services
SUBTITLE 15. INTERAGENCY COUNCIL ON CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES.
8–1501.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “INTERAGENCY COUNCIL” MEANS THE INTERAGENCY
COUNCIL ON CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES.
8–1502.
(A) THERE IS AN INTERAGENCY COUNCIL ON CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND
FAMILIES.
(B) THE INTERAGENCY COUNCIL SHALL CONSIST OF THE FOLLOWING
REPRESENTATIVES FROM EACH STATE AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR PROVIDING
MEDICAL OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE, SERVICES, OR SUPERVISION TO
CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES:
(1) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(2) THE SECRETARY OF JUVENILE SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(3) THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(5) THE MARYLAND INSURANCE COMMISSIONER, OR THE
COMMISSIONER’S DESIGNEE;
(6) THE PUBLIC DEFENDER, OR THE PUBLIC DEFENDER’S
DESIGNEE;
(7) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
– 21 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(8) THE DEPUTY SECRETARY OF THE MARYLAND MEDICAID
PROGRAM, OR THE DEPUTY SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(9) THE SPECIAL SECRETARY, OR THE SPECIAL SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(10) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE
COMMISSION, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(11) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE CHESAPEAKE REGIONAL
INFORMATION SYSTEM FOR OUR PATIENTS, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE;
(12) THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE QUALITY, OR
THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(13) THE COORDINATORS, AS DEFINED IN § 19–388 OF THE HEALTH –
GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
(14) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE STATE–AUTHORIZED
ADMINISTRATOR OF 2–1–1 SERVICES IN MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR.
(C) (1) THE SPECIAL SECRETARY, OR THE SPECIAL SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE, SHALL SERVE AS CHAIR OF THE INTERAGENCY COUNCIL.
(2) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE FOR CHILDREN SHALL PROVIDE STAFF
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COUNCIL.
(3) THE INTERAGENCY COUNCIL SHALL MEET MONTHLY AT THE
TIMES AND PLACES THAT THE INTERAGENCY COUNCIL DETERMINES.
8–1503.
(A) THE INTERAGENCY COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) COMPLETE AN ASSESSMENT OF THE CURRENT NUMBER OF
LICENSED BEDS, STAFFED BEDS, AND PHYSICAL BEDS INTENDED TO SERVE THE
NEEDS OF CHILDREN AND YOUTH BY AGENCY, CATEGORIZED BY TYPE OF BED
INCLUSIVE OF AGE, GENDER, DIAGNOSIS, SEVERITY, AND SPECIALTY ACCEPTED FOR
THE FOLLOWING BED TYPES:
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 160
(I) TRADITIONAL FOSTER HOMES;
(II) PRIVATE AND PUBLIC TREATMENT FOSTER HOMES;
(III) GROUP HOMES;
(IV) RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT CENTERS;
(V) PRIVATE AND PUBLIC INPATIENT PSYCHIATRIC BEDS; AND
(VI) RESPITE BEDS;
(2) DEVELOP AN ELECTRONIC PROCESS FOR TRACKING THE
REAL–TIME LOCATION, LENGTH OF STAY, AND DISCHARGE PLANS FOR PEDIATRIC
HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENTS, AS DEFINED IN § 19–388 OF THE HEALTH –
GENERAL ARTICLE, INCLUDING YOUTH UNDER OR IN THE PROCESS OF A
VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT;
(3) (I) DEVELOP A MODEL FOR STANDARDIZED DATA COLLECTION
WITH MANDATED UNIFORM METRICS, INCLUDING AGE, GENDER IDENTITY, RACE,
ETHNICITY, COUNTY OF ORIGIN, PAYER TYPE, AND LENGTH OF STAY FOR PEDIATRIC
HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENTS, AS DEFINED IN § 19–388 OF THE HEALTH –
GENERAL ARTICLE, INCLUDING YOUTH UNDER OR IN THE PROCESS OF A
VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT AGREEMENT; AND
(II) DESIGNATE AN ENTITY TO SERVE AS A CENTRAL
REPOSITORY FOR DATA COLLECTED; AND
(4) DEVELOP A PLAN AND IDENTIFY RESOURCES NEEDED TO EXPAND
MOBILE RESPONSE AND STABILIZATION SERVICES ACROSS THE STATE TO ENSURE
STATEWIDE ACCESS AND FULL IMPLEMENTATION BY 2030.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND JANUARY 1, 2028, THE
INTERAGENCY COUNCIL SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO
THE GOVERNOR, THE PLACEMENT MANAGER, AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Governor may transfer
positions and funds appropriated for positions from the Workgroup on Children in
Unlicensed Settings and Pediatric Hospital Overstays to the Governor’s Office for Children.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
– 23 –

Ch. 160 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of Human Services and the Maryland
Department of Health shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, on the progress of capacity building and preventive
services to end pediatric overstays, including:
(1) residential treatment beds;
(2) therapeutic foster care homes;
(3) specialized placements for high–needs youth;
(4) licensure of facilities and foster youth homes;
(5) mobile crisis response;
(6) 1915(i) waiver services;
(7) in–home services and wraparound supports; and
(8) necessary staffing.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That nothing in this Act authorizes
a hospital to discharge a pediatric overstay patient in a manner that is inconsistent with §
19–308.8 of the Health – General Article, State regulations governing hospital discharge,
or Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services conditions of participation.
SECTION 4. 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 3 of this Act shall
take effect October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end
of September 30, 2029, Section 2 3 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 4 Sections 7 and 8 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 24 –